Georgia, session 2025_26, HB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 8 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to county police,
is amended by revising Code Section 36-8-2, relating to terms of office, removal, and
authority to abolish county police force, as follows:
"36-8-2.
(a) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, the The terms
for which county police shall be elected or appointed shall be left to the discretion of the
county governing authority. Such county police or any member thereof may be removed
from office at any time, at the will of the county governing authority, with or without
cause. A resolution or ordinance authorizing the creation of a county police force adopted
by a county governing authority and approved by the qualified electors of the county in a
H. B. 309
- 1 -

LC 39 4463
special election as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-8-1 shall not affect the
power of the county governing authority to abolish a county police force at any time.
(b)(1) A county police force created pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 36-8-1
shall be abolished only by adoption of a resolution or ordinance by a county governing
authority and with approval by the qualified electors of such county pursuant to this
subsection.
(2) Any county governing authority seeking to abolish a police force created pursuant
to subsection (b) of Code Section 36-8-1 may authorize, through proper resolution or
ordinance, the abolishment of such county police force. No resolution or ordinance
adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall become effective until the governing authority
of the county has submitted to the qualified electors of the county the question of whether
the resolution or ordinance shall be approved or rejected. The county governing authority
shall establish the date of the election in compliance with Code Section 21-2-540, which
shall be not less than 30 days after the call of the election, and shall notify the county
election superintendent of its decision as to the date. The election superintendent shall
issue the call for the election and shall specify that the election shall be held on the date
determined by the county governing authority. The election superintendent shall cause
the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks
immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of the county. The ballot
shall have written or printed thereon the following:
'( ) YES Shall the resolution or ordinance adopted by the governing authority
( ) NO of (Name of County) to abolish the county police force be approved?'
(3) Those persons desiring to vote in favor of the abolishment of the county police force
shall vote 'Yes,' and those persons opposed to the abolishment of the county police force
shall vote 'No.' If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are in favor of the
abolishment of the county police force, then the county governing authority shall be
authorized to abolish the county police force pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
H. B. 309
- 2 -

LC 39 4463
otherwise, the county police force shall not be abolished. If the resolution or ordinance
is rejected by the qualified electors, the question of the abolishment of the county police
force may not again be submitted to the voters of the county within 48 months
immediately following the month in which such election was held. The county election
superintendent shall hold and conduct the election under the same rules and regulations
as govern special elections, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this
subsection. He or she shall canvass the returns and declare and certify the result of the
election to the Secretary of State. The expense of any such election shall be borne by the
county wherein the election was held."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 309
- 3 -